Illinois, session 104th, HB3490.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Complex Wheelchair Right to Repair Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Authorized repair provider" means an individual or 8business who has an arrangement with the original equipment 9manufacturer under which the original equipment manufacturer 10grants to the individual or business a license to use a trade 11name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the 12purposes of offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance, 13or repair of a complex wheelchair under the name of the 14original equipment manufacturer, or other arrangement with the 15original equipment manufacturer to offer such services on 16behalf of the original equipment manufacturer. An original 17equipment manufacturer who offers the services of diagnosis, 18maintenance, or repair of its own complex wheelchair, and who 19does not have an arrangement with an unaffiliated individual 20or business, shall be considered an authorized repair provider 21with respect to complex wheelchairs.22    "Complex wheelchair" means a manual wheelchair or a 23power-driven wheelchair that can accommodate rehabilitative   HB3490- 2 -LRB104 08706 SPS 18760 b1accessories and features. As used in this definition, a 2power-driven wheelchair includes the following 3classifications: (i) group 2 power wheelchair with power 4options; (ii) group 3 power wheelchair; (iii) group 4 power 5wheelchair; or (iv) group 5 power wheelchair.6    "Documentation" means any manual, diagram, reporting 7output, service code description, schematic diagram, security 8codes, passwords, or other guidance or information used in 9effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of 10a complex wheelchair.11    "Fair and reasonable terms" means making available parts, 12tools, or documentation as follows:13        (1) that documentation is made available by the 14    original equipment manufacturer at no charge, except that, 15    when the documentation is requested in physical printed 16    form, a charge may be included for the reasonable, actual 17    costs of preparing and sending the copy;18        (2) that tools are made available by the original 19    equipment manufacturer at no charge and without requiring 20    authorization or internet access for use or operation of 21    the tool, or imposing impediments to access or use of the 22    tools to diagnose, maintain, or repair and enable full 23    functionality of digital electronic equipment, or in a 24    manner that impairs the efficient and cost-effective 25    performance of any such diagnosis, maintenance, or repair, 26    except that, when the tool is requested in physical form,   HB3490- 3 -LRB104 08706 SPS 18760 b1    a charge may be included for the reasonable, actual costs 2    of preparing and sending the tool; and3        (3) that parts are made available by the original 4    equipment manufacturer, either directly or through an 5    authorized repair provider, to independents repair 6    providers and owners at costs and terms that are 7    equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms under 8    which an original equipment manufacturer offers the parts 9    to an authorized repair provider and that:10            (A) accounts for any discount, rebate, convenient 11        and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully 12        restored and updated functionality, rights of use, or 13        other incentive and preference the original 14        manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider, 15        or any additional cost, burden, or impediment the 16        original equipment manufacturer imposes on an owner or 17        independent repair provider;18            (B) is not conditioned on or imposing a 19        substantial obligation or restriction that is not 20        reasonably necessary for enabling the owner or 21        independent repair provider to engage in the 22        diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of equipment made by 23        or on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer; 24        and25            (C) is not conditioned on an arrangement with the 26        original equipment manufacturer.  HB3490- 4 -LRB104 08706 SPS 18760 b1    "Independent repair provider" means an individual or 2business operating in this State that is unaffiliated with an 3original equipment manufacturer that is engaged in the 4services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of complex 5wheelchairs.6    "Original equipment manufacturer" means a business engaged 7in the business of selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying 8new complex wheelchairs manufactured by, or on behalf of, 9itself, to any individual or business.10    "Owner" means an individual or business who owns or leases 11a complex wheelchair purchased or used in this State.12    "Part" means any replacement part, either new or used, 13made available by an original equipment manufacturer for 14purposes of effecting the services of maintenance or repair of 15a complex wheelchair manufactured by or on behalf of, sold, or 16otherwise supplied by the original equipment manufacturer.17    "Tools" means any software program, hardware implement, or 18other apparatus used for diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of 19a complex wheelchair, including software or other mechanisms 20that provision, program, or pair a new part, calibrate 21functionality, or perform any other function required to bring 22the product back to fully functional condition, including any 23updates.24    "Trade secret" has the meaning given to that term in 25subsection (d) of Section 2 of the Illinois Trade Secrets Act.   HB3490- 5 -LRB104 08706 SPS 18760 b1    Section 10. Right to repair.2    (a) For complex wheelchairs and parts for complex 3wheelchairs that are sold or used in this State, an original 4equipment manufacturer shall make available to any independent 5repair provider and owner of a complex wheelchair manufactured 6by on behalf of, or sold by such original equipment 7manufacturer, on fair and reasonable terms, any documentation, 8parts, and tools, required for the diagnosis, maintenance, or 9repair of such a complex wheelchair and parts for the complex 10wheelchair, inclusive of any updates to information. The 11documentation parts and tools shall be made available either 12directly by the original equipment manufacturer or via an 13authorized repair provider.14    (b) For equipment that contains an electronic security 15lock or other security-related function, the original 16equipment manufacturer shall make available to any owner and 17independent repair provider, on fair and reasonable terms, any 18special documentation, tools, and parts needed to access and 19reset the lock or function when disabled in the course of 20diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the complex wheelchair. 21The documentation, tools, and parts may be made available 22through appropriate secure release systems. 23    Section 15. Enforcement by Attorney General. A violation 24of any of the provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice 25under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act.   HB3490- 6 -LRB104 08706 SPS 18760 b1All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 2General by that Act shall be available to him or her for the 3enforcement of this Act. 4    Section 20. Limitations.5    (a) Nothing in this Act shall require an original 6equipment manufacturer to divulge any trade secret to any 7owner or independent service provider.8    (b) Nothing in this Act shall to alter the terms of any 9arrangement in force between an authorized repair provider and 10an original equipment manufacturer, including, but not limited 11to, the performance or provision of warranty or recall repair 12work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an original 13equipment manufacturer and pursuant to such arrangement, 14except that any provision in the terms that purports to waive, 15avoid, restrict or limit the original equipment manufacturer's 16obligations to comply with this Act shall be void and 17unenforceable.18    (c) No original equipment manufacturer or authorized 19repair provider shall be liable for any damage or injury 20caused to any complex wheelchair by an independent repair 21provider or owner which occurs during the course of repair, 22diagnosis, or maintenance. 23    Section 25. Applicability. This Act applies with respect 24to complex wheelchairs sold or in use on or after the effective   HB3490- 7 -LRB104 08706 SPS 18760 b1date of this Act. 2    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 3Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2BBBB as follows: 4    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)5    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Complex Wheelchair Right to 6Repair Act. A person who violates the Complex Wheelchair Right 7to Repair Act commits an unlawful practice within the meaning 8of this Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 101, 2026.